Maine, session 132, LD586.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 19-A MRSA §4110, sub-§3, ¶E-1 is enacted to read:
E-1. Directing the defendant to refrain from knowingly being within a specified
distance of the plaintiff or prohibiting the defendant from being present at a specific
location;
Sec. 2. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.
Page 1 - 132LR0807(02)